Illinois, session 104th, SB3330.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 524-12 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/24-12)7    Sec. 24-12. Removal or dismissal of teachers in 8contractual continued service. 9    (a) This subsection (a) applies only to honorable 10dismissals and recalls in which the notice of dismissal is 11provided on or before the end of the 2010-2011 school term. If 12a teacher in contractual continued service is removed or 13dismissed as a result of a decision of the board to decrease 14the number of teachers employed by the board or to discontinue 15some particular type of teaching service, written notice shall 16be mailed to the teacher and also given the teacher either by 17certified mail, return receipt requested or personal delivery 18with receipt at least 60 days before the end of the school 19term, together with a statement of honorable dismissal and the 20reason therefor, and in all such cases the board shall first 21remove or dismiss all teachers who have not entered upon 22contractual continued service before removing or dismissing 23any teacher who has entered upon contractual continued service   SB3330- 2 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1and who is legally qualified to hold a position currently held 2by a teacher who has not entered upon contractual continued 3service. 4    As between teachers who have entered upon contractual 5continued service, the teacher or teachers with the shorter 6length of continuing service with the district shall be 7dismissed first unless an alternative method of determining 8the sequence of dismissal is established in a collective 9bargaining agreement or contract between the board and a 10professional faculty members' organization and except that 11this provision shall not impair the operation of any 12affirmative action program in the district, regardless of 13whether it exists by operation of law or is conducted on a 14voluntary basis by the board. Any teacher dismissed as a 15result of such decrease or discontinuance shall be paid all 16earned compensation on or before the third business day 17following the last day of pupil attendance in the regular 18school term. 19    If the board has any vacancies for the following school 20term or within one calendar year from the beginning of the 21following school term, the positions thereby becoming 22available shall be tendered to the teachers so removed or 23dismissed so far as they are legally qualified to hold such 24positions; provided, however, that if the number of honorable 25dismissal notices based on economic necessity exceeds 15% of 26the number of full-time equivalent positions filled by   SB3330- 3 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1certified employees (excluding principals and administrative 2personnel) during the preceding school year, then if the board 3has any vacancies for the following school term or within 2 4calendar years from the beginning of the following school 5term, the positions so becoming available shall be tendered to 6the teachers who were so notified and removed or dismissed 7whenever they are legally qualified to hold such positions. 8Each board shall, in consultation with any exclusive employee 9representatives, each year establish a list, categorized by 10positions, showing the length of continuing service of each 11teacher who is qualified to hold any such positions, unless an 12alternative method of determining a sequence of dismissal is 13established as provided for in this Section, in which case a 14list shall be made in accordance with the alternative method. 15Copies of the list shall be distributed to the exclusive 16employee representative on or before February 1 of each year. 17Whenever the number of honorable dismissal notices based upon 18economic necessity exceeds 5, or 150% of the average number of 19teachers honorably dismissed in the preceding 3 years, 20whichever is more, then the board also shall hold a public 21hearing on the question of the dismissals. Following the 22hearing and board review, the action to approve any such 23reduction shall require a majority vote of the board members.24    (b) If any teacher, whether or not in contractual 25continued service, is removed or dismissed as a result of a 26decision of a school board to decrease the number of teachers   SB3330- 4 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1employed by the board, a decision of a school board to 2discontinue some particular type of teaching service, or a 3reduction in the number of programs or positions in a special 4education joint agreement, then written notice must be mailed 5to the teacher and also given to the teacher either by 6electronic mail, certified mail, return receipt requested, or 7personal delivery with receipt on or before April 15, together 8with a statement of honorable dismissal and the reason 9therefor, and in all such cases the sequence of dismissal 10shall occur in accordance with this subsection (b); except 11that this subsection (b) shall not impair the operation of any 12affirmative action program in the school district, regardless 13of whether it exists by operation of law or is conducted on a 14voluntary basis by the board.15    Each teacher must be categorized into one or more 16positions for which the teacher is qualified to hold, based 17upon legal qualifications and any other qualifications 18established in a district or joint agreement job description, 19on or before the May 10 prior to the school year during which 20the sequence of dismissal is determined. Within each position 21and subject to agreements made by the joint committee on 22honorable dismissals that are authorized by subsection (c) of 23this Section, the school district or joint agreement must 24establish 4 groupings of teachers qualified to hold the 25position as follows:26        (1) Grouping one shall consist of each teacher who is   SB3330- 5 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    not in contractual continued service and who (i) has not 2    received a performance evaluation rating, (ii) is employed 3    for one school term or less to replace a teacher on leave, 4    or (iii) is employed on a part-time basis. "Part-time 5    basis" for the purposes of this subsection (b) means a 6    teacher who is employed to teach less than a full-day, 7    teacher workload or less than 5 days of the normal student 8    attendance week, unless otherwise provided for in a 9    collective bargaining agreement between the district and 10    the exclusive representative of the district's teachers. 11    For the purposes of this Section, a teacher (A) who is 12    employed as a full-time teacher but who actually teaches 13    or is otherwise present and participating in the 14    district's educational program for less than a school term 15    or (B) who, in the immediately previous school term, was 16    employed on a full-time basis and actually taught or was 17    otherwise present and participated in the district's 18    educational program for 120 days or more is not considered 19    employed on a part-time basis.20        (2) Grouping 2 shall consist of each teacher with a 21    Needs Improvement or Unsatisfactory performance evaluation 22    rating on either of the teacher's last 2 performance 23    evaluation ratings.24        (3) Grouping 3 shall consist of each teacher with a 25    performance evaluation rating of at least Satisfactory or 26    Proficient on both of the teacher's last 2 performance   SB3330- 6 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    evaluation ratings, if 2 ratings are available, or on the 2    teacher's last performance evaluation rating, if only one 3    rating is available, unless the teacher qualifies for 4    placement into grouping 4.5        (4) Grouping 4 shall consist of each teacher whose 6    last 2 performance evaluation ratings are Excellent and 7    each teacher with 2 Excellent performance evaluation 8    ratings out of the teacher's last 3 performance evaluation 9    ratings with a third rating of Satisfactory or Proficient.10    Among teachers qualified to hold a position, teachers must 11be dismissed in the order of their groupings, with teachers in 12grouping one dismissed first and teachers in grouping 4 13dismissed last.14    Within grouping one, the sequence of dismissal must be at 15the discretion of the school district or joint agreement. 16Within grouping 2, the sequence of dismissal must be based 17upon average performance evaluation ratings, with the teacher 18or teachers with the lowest average performance evaluation 19rating dismissed first. A teacher's average performance 20evaluation rating must be calculated using the average of the 21teacher's last 2 performance evaluation ratings, if 2 ratings 22are available, or the teacher's last performance evaluation 23rating, if only one rating is available, using the following 24numerical values: 4 for Excellent; 3 for Proficient or 25Satisfactory; 2 for Needs Improvement; and 1 for 26Unsatisfactory. As between or among teachers in grouping 2   SB3330- 7 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1with the same average performance evaluation rating and within 2each of groupings 3 and 4, the teacher or teachers with the 3shorter length of continuing service with the school district 4or joint agreement must be dismissed first unless an 5alternative method of determining the sequence of dismissal is 6established in a collective bargaining agreement or contract 7between the board and a professional faculty members' 8organization.9    Each board, including the governing board of a joint 10agreement, shall, in consultation with any exclusive employee 11representatives, each year establish a sequence of honorable 12dismissal list categorized by positions and the groupings 13defined in this subsection (b). Copies of the list showing 14each teacher by name, along with the race or ethnicity of the 15teacher if provided by the teacher, and categorized by 16positions and the groupings defined in this subsection (b) 17must be distributed to the exclusive bargaining representative 18at least 75 days before the end of the school term, provided 19that the school district or joint agreement may, with notice 20to any exclusive employee representatives, move teachers from 21grouping one into another grouping during the period of time 22from 75 days until April 15. Each year, each board shall also 23establish, in consultation with any exclusive employee 24representatives, a list showing the length of continuing 25service of each teacher who is qualified to hold any such 26positions, unless an alternative method of determining a   SB3330- 8 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1sequence of dismissal is established as provided for in this 2Section, in which case a list must be made in accordance with 3the alternative method. Copies of the list must be distributed 4to the exclusive employee representative at least 75 days 5before the end of the school term. 6    Any teacher dismissed as a result of such decrease or 7discontinuance must be paid all earned compensation on or 8before the third business day following the last day of pupil 9attendance in the regular school term.10    If the board or joint agreement has any vacancies for the 11following school term or within one calendar year from the 12beginning of the following school term, the positions thereby 13becoming available must be tendered to the teachers so removed 14or dismissed who were in grouping 3 or 4 of the sequence of 15dismissal and are qualified to hold the positions, based upon 16legal qualifications and any other qualifications established 17in a district or joint agreement job description, on or before 18the May 10 prior to the date of the positions becoming 19available, provided that if the number of honorable dismissal 20notices based on economic necessity exceeds 15% of the number 21of full-time equivalent positions filled by certified 22employees (excluding principals and administrative personnel) 23during the preceding school year, then the recall period is 24for the following school term or within 2 calendar years from 25the beginning of the following school term. If the board or 26joint agreement has any vacancies within the period from the   SB3330- 9 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1beginning of the following school term through February 1 of 2the following school term (unless a date later than February 31, but no later than 6 months from the beginning of the 4following school term, is established in a collective 5bargaining agreement), the positions thereby becoming 6available must be tendered to the teachers so removed or 7dismissed who were in grouping 2 of the sequence of dismissal 8due to one "needs improvement" rating on either of the 9teacher's last 2 performance evaluation ratings, provided 10that, if 2 ratings are available, the other performance 11evaluation rating used for grouping purposes is 12"satisfactory", "proficient", or "excellent", and are 13qualified to hold the positions, based upon legal 14qualifications and any other qualifications established in a 15district or joint agreement job description, on or before the 16May 10 prior to the date of the positions becoming available. 17On and after July 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 1898-648), the preceding sentence shall apply to teachers 19removed or dismissed by honorable dismissal, even if notice of 20honorable dismissal occurred during the 2013-2014 school year. 21Among teachers eligible for recall pursuant to the preceding 22sentence, the order of recall must be in inverse order of 23dismissal, unless an alternative order of recall is 24established in a collective bargaining agreement or contract 25between the board and a professional faculty members' 26organization. Whenever the number of honorable dismissal   SB3330- 10 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1notices based upon economic necessity exceeds 5 notices or 2150% of the average number of teachers honorably dismissed in 3the preceding 3 years, whichever is more, then the school 4board or governing board of a joint agreement, as applicable, 5shall also hold a public hearing on the question of the 6dismissals. Following the hearing and board review, the action 7to approve any such reduction shall require a majority vote of 8the board members.9    For purposes of this subsection (b), subject to agreement 10on an alternative definition reached by the joint committee 11described in subsection (c) of this Section, a teacher's 12performance evaluation rating means the overall performance 13evaluation rating resulting from an annual or biennial 14performance evaluation conducted pursuant to Article 24A of 15this Code by the school district or joint agreement 16determining the sequence of dismissal, not including any 17performance evaluation conducted during or at the end of a 18remediation period. No more than one evaluation rating each 19school term shall be one of the evaluation ratings used for the 20purpose of determining the sequence of dismissal. Except as 21otherwise provided in this subsection for any performance 22evaluations conducted during or at the end of a remediation 23period, if multiple performance evaluations are conducted in a 24school term, only the rating from the last evaluation 25conducted prior to establishing the sequence of honorable 26dismissal list in such school term shall be the one evaluation   SB3330- 11 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1rating from that school term used for the purpose of 2determining the sequence of dismissal. Averaging ratings from 3multiple evaluations is not permitted unless otherwise agreed 4to in a collective bargaining agreement or contract between 5the board and a professional faculty members' organization. 6The preceding 3 sentences are not a legislative declaration 7that existing law does or does not already require that only 8one performance evaluation each school term shall be used for 9the purpose of determining the sequence of dismissal. For 10performance evaluation ratings determined prior to September 111, 2012, any school district or joint agreement with a 12performance evaluation rating system that does not use either 13of the rating category systems specified in subsection (d) of 14Section 24A-5 of this Code for all teachers must establish a 15basis for assigning each teacher a rating that complies with 16subsection (d) of Section 24A-5 of this Code for all of the 17performance evaluation ratings that are to be used to 18determine the sequence of dismissal. A teacher's grouping and 19ranking on a sequence of honorable dismissal shall be deemed a 20part of the teacher's performance evaluation, and that 21information shall be disclosed to the exclusive bargaining 22representative as part of a sequence of honorable dismissal 23list, notwithstanding any laws prohibiting disclosure of such 24information. A performance evaluation rating may be used to 25determine the sequence of dismissal, notwithstanding the 26pendency of any grievance resolution or arbitration procedures   SB3330- 12 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1relating to the performance evaluation. If a teacher has 2received at least one performance evaluation rating conducted 3by the school district or joint agreement determining the 4sequence of dismissal and a subsequent performance evaluation 5is not conducted in any school year in which such evaluation is 6required to be conducted under Section 24A-5 of this Code, the 7teacher's performance evaluation rating for that school year 8for purposes of determining the sequence of dismissal is 9deemed Proficient, except that, during any time in which the 10Governor has declared a disaster due to a public health 11emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency 12Management Agency Act, this default to Proficient does not 13apply to any teacher who has entered into contractual 14continued service and who was deemed Excellent on his or her 15most recent evaluation. During any time in which the Governor 16has declared a disaster due to a public health emergency 17pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management 18Agency Act and unless the school board and any exclusive 19bargaining representative have completed the performance 20rating for teachers or have mutually agreed to an alternate 21performance rating, any teacher who has entered into 22contractual continued service, whose most recent evaluation 23was deemed Excellent, and whose performance evaluation is not 24conducted when the evaluation is required to be conducted 25shall receive a teacher's performance rating deemed Excellent. 26A school board and any exclusive bargaining representative may   SB3330- 13 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1mutually agree to an alternate performance rating for teachers 2not in contractual continued service during any time in which 3the Governor has declared a disaster due to a public health 4emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency 5Management Agency Act, as long as the agreement is in writing. 6If a performance evaluation rating is nullified as the result 7of an arbitration, administrative agency, or court 8determination, then the school district or joint agreement is 9deemed to have conducted a performance evaluation for that 10school year, but the performance evaluation rating may not be 11used in determining the sequence of dismissal.12    Nothing in this subsection (b) shall be construed as 13limiting the right of a school board or governing board of a 14joint agreement to dismiss a teacher not in contractual 15continued service in accordance with Section 24-11 of this 16Code.17    Any provisions regarding the sequence of honorable 18dismissals and recall of honorably dismissed teachers in a 19collective bargaining agreement entered into on or before 20January 1, 2011 and in effect on June 13, 2011 (the effective 21date of Public Act 97-8) that may conflict with Public Act 97-8 22shall remain in effect through the expiration of such 23agreement or June 30, 2013, whichever is earlier.24    (c) Each school district and special education joint 25agreement must use a joint committee composed of equal 26representation selected by the school board and its teachers   SB3330- 14 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1or, if applicable, the exclusive bargaining representative of 2its teachers, to address the matters described in paragraphs 3(1) through (5) of this subsection (c) pertaining to honorable 4dismissals under subsection (b) of this Section.5        (1) The joint committee must consider and may agree to 6    criteria for excluding from grouping 2 and placing into 7    grouping 3 a teacher whose last 2 performance evaluations 8    include a Needs Improvement and either a Proficient or 9    Excellent.10        (2) The joint committee must consider and may agree to 11    an alternative definition for grouping 4, which definition 12    must take into account prior performance evaluation 13    ratings and may take into account other factors that 14    relate to the school district's or program's educational 15    objectives. An alternative definition for grouping 4 may 16    not permit the inclusion of a teacher in the grouping with 17    a Needs Improvement or Unsatisfactory performance 18    evaluation rating on either of the teacher's last 2 19    performance evaluation ratings.20        (3) The joint committee may agree to including within 21    the definition of a performance evaluation rating a 22    performance evaluation rating administered by a school 23    district or joint agreement other than the school district 24    or joint agreement determining the sequence of dismissal.25        (4) For each school district or joint agreement that 26    administers performance evaluation ratings that are   SB3330- 15 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    inconsistent with either of the rating category systems 2    specified in subsection (d) of Section 24A-5 of this Code, 3    the school district or joint agreement must consult with 4    the joint committee on the basis for assigning a rating 5    that complies with subsection (d) of Section 24A-5 of this 6    Code to each performance evaluation rating that will be 7    used in a sequence of dismissal.8        (5) Upon request by a joint committee member submitted 9    to the employing board by no later than 10 days after the 10    distribution of the sequence of honorable dismissal list, 11    a representative of the employing board shall, within 5 12    days after the request, provide to members of the joint 13    committee a list showing the most recent and prior 14    performance evaluation ratings of each teacher identified 15    only by length of continuing service in the district or 16    joint agreement and not by name. If, after review of this 17    list, a member of the joint committee has a good faith 18    belief that a disproportionate number of teachers with 19    greater length of continuing service with the district or 20    joint agreement have received a recent performance 21    evaluation rating lower than the prior rating, the member 22    may request that the joint committee review the list to 23    assess whether such a trend may exist. Following the joint 24    committee's review, but by no later than the end of the 25    applicable school term, the joint committee or any member 26    or members of the joint committee may submit a report of   SB3330- 16 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    the review to the employing board and exclusive bargaining 2    representative, if any. Nothing in this paragraph (5) 3    shall impact the order of honorable dismissal or a school 4    district's or joint agreement's authority to carry out a 5    dismissal in accordance with subsection (b) of this 6    Section.7    Agreement by the joint committee as to a matter requires 8the majority vote of all committee members, and if the joint 9committee does not reach agreement on a matter, then the 10otherwise applicable requirements of subsection (b) of this 11Section shall apply. Except as explicitly set forth in this 12subsection (c), a joint committee has no authority to agree to 13any further modifications to the requirements for honorable 14dismissals set forth in subsection (b) of this Section. The 15joint committee must be established, and the first meeting of 16the joint committee each school year must occur on or before 17December 1.18    The joint committee must reach agreement on a matter on or 19before February 1 of a school year in order for the agreement 20of the joint committee to apply to the sequence of dismissal 21determined during that school year. Subject to the February 1 22deadline for agreements, the agreement of a joint committee on 23a matter shall apply to the sequence of dismissal until the 24agreement is amended or terminated by the joint committee. 25    The provisions of the Open Meetings Act shall not apply to 26meetings of a joint committee created under this subsection   SB3330- 17 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1(c). 2    (d) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this 3subsection (d), the requirements and dismissal procedures of 4Section 24-16.5 of this Code shall apply to any dismissal 5sought under Section 24-16.5 of this Code.6        (1) If a dismissal of a teacher in contractual 7    continued service is sought for any reason or cause other 8    than an honorable dismissal under subsections (a) or (b) 9    of this Section or a dismissal sought under Section 10    24-16.5 of this Code, including those under Section 11    10-22.4, the board must first approve a motion containing 12    specific charges by a majority vote of all its members. 13    Written notice of such charges, including a bill of 14    particulars and the teacher's right to request a hearing, 15    must be mailed to the teacher and also given to the teacher 16    either by electronic mail, certified mail, return receipt 17    requested, or personal delivery with receipt within 5 days 18    of the adoption of the motion. Any written notice sent on 19    or after July 1, 2012 shall inform the teacher of the right 20    to request a hearing before a mutually selected hearing 21    officer, with the cost of the hearing officer split 22    equally between the teacher and the board, or a hearing 23    before a board-selected hearing officer, with the cost of 24    the hearing officer paid by the board.25        Before setting a hearing on charges stemming from 26    causes that are considered remediable, a board must give   SB3330- 18 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    the teacher reasonable warning in writing, stating 2    specifically the causes that, if not removed, may result 3    in charges; however, no such written warning is required 4    if the causes have been the subject of a remediation plan 5    pursuant to Article 24A of this Code.6        If, in the opinion of the board, the interests of the 7    school require it, the board may suspend the teacher 8    without pay, pending the hearing, but if the board's 9    dismissal or removal is not sustained, the teacher shall 10    not suffer the loss of any salary or benefits by reason of 11    the suspension.12        (2) No hearing upon the charges is required unless the 13    teacher within 17 days after receiving notice requests in 14    writing of the board that a hearing be scheduled before a 15    mutually selected hearing officer or a hearing officer 16    selected by the board. The secretary of the school board 17    shall forward a copy of the notice to the State Board of 18    Education.19        (3) Within 5 business days after receiving a notice of 20    hearing in which either notice to the teacher was sent 21    before July 1, 2012 or, if the notice was sent on or after 22    July 1, 2012, the teacher has requested a hearing before a 23    mutually selected hearing officer, the State Board of 24    Education shall provide a list of 5 prospective, impartial 25    hearing officers from the master list of qualified, 26    impartial hearing officers maintained by the State Board   SB3330- 19 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    of Education. Each person on the master list must (i) be 2    accredited by a national arbitration organization and have 3    had a minimum of 5 years of experience directly related to 4    labor and employment relations matters between employers 5    and employees or their exclusive bargaining 6    representatives and (ii) beginning September 1, 2012, have 7    participated in training provided or approved by the State 8    Board of Education for teacher dismissal hearing officers 9    so that he or she is familiar with issues generally 10    involved in evaluative and non-evaluative dismissals.11        If notice to the teacher was sent before July 1, 2012 12    or, if the notice was sent on or after July 1, 2012, the 13    teacher has requested a hearing before a mutually selected 14    hearing officer, the board and the teacher or their legal 15    representatives within 3 business days shall alternately 16    strike one name from the list provided by the State Board 17    of Education until only one name remains. Unless waived by 18    the teacher, the teacher shall have the right to proceed 19    first with the striking. Within 3 business days of receipt 20    of the list provided by the State Board of Education, the 21    board and the teacher or their legal representatives shall 22    each have the right to reject all prospective hearing 23    officers named on the list and notify the State Board of 24    Education of such rejection. Within 3 business days after 25    receiving this notification, the State Board of Education 26    shall appoint a qualified person from the master list who   SB3330- 20 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    did not appear on the list sent to the parties to serve as 2    the hearing officer, unless the parties notify it that 3    they have chosen to alternatively select a hearing officer 4    under paragraph (4) of this subsection (d).5        If the teacher has requested a hearing before a 6    hearing officer selected by the board, the board shall 7    select one name from the master list of qualified 8    impartial hearing officers maintained by the State Board 9    of Education within 3 business days after receipt and 10    shall notify the State Board of Education of its 11    selection.12        A hearing officer mutually selected by the parties, 13    selected by the board, or selected through an alternative 14    selection process under paragraph (4) of this subsection 15    (d) (A) must not be a resident of the school district, (B) 16    must be available to commence the hearing within 75 days 17    and conclude the hearing within 120 days after being 18    selected as the hearing officer, and (C) must issue a 19    decision as to whether the teacher must be dismissed and 20    give a copy of that decision to both the teacher and the 21    board within 30 days from the conclusion of the hearing or 22    closure of the record, whichever is later.23        Any hearing convened during a public health emergency 24    pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management 25    Agency Act may be convened remotely. Any hearing officer 26    for a hearing convened during a public health emergency   SB3330- 21 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    pursuant to Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management 2    Agency Act may voluntarily withdraw from the hearing and 3    another hearing officer shall be selected or appointed 4    pursuant to this Section. 5        In this paragraph, "pre-hearing procedures" refers to 6    the pre-hearing procedures under Section 51.55 of Title 23 7    of the Illinois Administrative Code and "hearing" refers 8    to the hearing under Section 51.60 of Title 23 of the 9    Illinois Administrative Code. Any teacher who has been 10    charged with engaging in acts of corporal punishment, 11    physical abuse, grooming, or sexual misconduct and who 12    previously paused pre-hearing procedures or a hearing 13    pursuant to Public Act 101-643 must proceed with selection 14    of a hearing officer or hearing date, or both, within the 15    timeframes established by this paragraph (3) and 16    paragraphs (4) through (6) of this subsection (d), unless 17    the timeframes are mutually waived in writing by both 18    parties, and all timelines set forth in this Section in 19    cases concerning corporal punishment, physical abuse, 20    grooming, or sexual misconduct shall be reset to begin the 21    day after April 22, 2022 (the effective date of Public Act 22    102-708). Any teacher charged with engaging in acts of 23    corporal punishment, physical abuse, grooming, or sexual 24    misconduct on or after April 22, 2022 (the effective date 25    of Public Act 102-708) may not pause pre-hearing 26    procedures or a hearing.  SB3330- 22 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1        (4) In the alternative to selecting a hearing officer 2    from the list received from the State Board of Education 3    or accepting the appointment of a hearing officer by the 4    State Board of Education or if the State Board of 5    Education cannot provide a list or appoint a hearing 6    officer that meets the foregoing requirements, the board 7    and the teacher or their legal representatives may 8    mutually agree to select an impartial hearing officer who 9    is not on the master list either by direct appointment by 10    the parties or by using procedures for the appointment of 11    an arbitrator established by the Federal Mediation and 12    Conciliation Service or the American Arbitration 13    Association. The parties shall notify the State Board of 14    Education of their intent to select a hearing officer 15    using an alternative procedure within 3 business days of 16    receipt of a list of prospective hearing officers provided 17    by the State Board of Education, notice of appointment of 18    a hearing officer by the State Board of Education, or 19    receipt of notice from the State Board of Education that 20    it cannot provide a list that meets the foregoing 21    requirements, whichever is later. 22        (5) If the notice of dismissal was sent to the teacher 23    before July 1, 2012, the fees and costs for the hearing 24    officer must be paid by the State Board of Education. If 25    the notice of dismissal was sent to the teacher on or after 26    July 1, 2012, the hearing officer's fees and costs must be   SB3330- 23 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    paid as follows in this paragraph (5). The fees and 2    permissible costs for the hearing officer must be 3    determined by the State Board of Education. If the board 4    and the teacher or their legal representatives mutually 5    agree to select an impartial hearing officer who is not on 6    a list received from the State Board of Education, they 7    may agree to supplement the fees determined by the State 8    Board to the hearing officer, at a rate consistent with 9    the hearing officer's published professional fees. If the 10    hearing officer is mutually selected by the parties, then 11    the board and the teacher or their legal representatives 12    shall each pay 50% of the fees and costs and any 13    supplemental allowance to which they agree. If the hearing 14    officer is selected by the board, then the board shall pay 15    100% of the hearing officer's fees and costs. The fees and 16    costs must be paid to the hearing officer within 14 days 17    after the board and the teacher or their legal 18    representatives receive the hearing officer's decision set 19    forth in paragraph (7) of this subsection (d).20        (6) The teacher is required to answer the bill of 21    particulars and aver affirmative matters in his or her 22    defense, and the time for initially doing so and the time 23    for updating such answer and defenses after pre-hearing 24    discovery must be set by the hearing officer. The State 25    Board of Education shall promulgate rules so that each 26    party has a fair opportunity to present its case and to   SB3330- 24 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    ensure that the dismissal process proceeds in a fair and 2    expeditious manner. These rules shall address, without 3    limitation, discovery and hearing scheduling conferences; 4    the teacher's initial answer and affirmative defenses to 5    the bill of particulars and the updating of that 6    information after pre-hearing discovery; provision for 7    written interrogatories and requests for production of 8    documents; the requirement that each party initially 9    disclose to the other party and then update the disclosure 10    no later than 10 calendar days prior to the commencement 11    of the hearing, the names and addresses of persons who may 12    be called as witnesses at the hearing, a summary of the 13    facts or opinions each witness will testify to, and all 14    other documents and materials, including information 15    maintained electronically, relevant to its own as well as 16    the other party's case (the hearing officer may exclude 17    witnesses and exhibits not identified and shared, except 18    those offered in rebuttal for which the party could not 19    reasonably have anticipated prior to the hearing); 20    pre-hearing discovery and preparation, including provision 21    for written interrogatories and requests for production of 22    documents, provided that discovery depositions are 23    prohibited; the conduct of the hearing; the right of each 24    party to be represented by counsel, the offer of evidence 25    and witnesses and the cross-examination of witnesses; the 26    authority of the hearing officer to issue subpoenas and   SB3330- 25 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    subpoenas duces tecum, provided that the hearing officer 2    may limit the number of witnesses to be subpoenaed on 3    behalf of each party to no more than 7; the length of 4    post-hearing briefs; and the form, length, and content of 5    hearing officers' decisions. The hearing officer shall 6    hold a hearing and render a final decision for dismissal 7    pursuant to Article 24A of this Code or shall report to the 8    school board findings of fact and a recommendation as to 9    whether or not the teacher must be dismissed for conduct. 10    The hearing officer shall commence the hearing within 75 11    days and conclude the hearing within 120 days after being 12    selected as the hearing officer, provided that the hearing 13    officer may modify these timelines upon the showing of 14    good cause or mutual agreement of the parties. Good cause 15    for the purpose of this subsection (d) shall mean the 16    illness or otherwise unavoidable emergency of the teacher, 17    district representative, their legal representatives, the 18    hearing officer, or an essential witness as indicated in 19    each party's pre-hearing submission. In a dismissal 20    hearing pursuant to Article 24A of this Code in which a 21    witness is a student or is under the age of 18, the hearing 22    officer must make accommodations for the witness, as 23    provided under paragraph (6.5) of this subsection. The 24    hearing officer shall consider and give weight to all of 25    the teacher's evaluations written pursuant to Article 24A 26    that are relevant to the issues in the hearing.  SB3330- 26 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1        Each party shall have no more than 3 days to present 2    its case, unless extended by the hearing officer to enable 3    a party to present adequate evidence and testimony, 4    including due to the other party's cross-examination of 5    the party's witnesses, for good cause or by mutual 6    agreement of the parties. The State Board of Education 7    shall define in rules the meaning of "day" for such 8    purposes. All testimony at the hearing shall be taken 9    under oath administered by the hearing officer. The 10    hearing officer shall cause a record of the proceedings to 11    be kept and shall employ a competent reporter to take 12    stenographic or stenotype notes of all the testimony. The 13    costs of the reporter's attendance and services at the 14    hearing shall be paid by the party or parties who are 15    responsible for paying the fees and costs of the hearing 16    officer. Either party desiring a transcript of the hearing 17    shall pay for the cost thereof. Any post-hearing briefs 18    must be submitted by the parties by no later than 21 days 19    after a party's receipt of the transcript of the hearing, 20    unless extended by the hearing officer for good cause or 21    by mutual agreement of the parties.22        (6.5) In the case of charges involving any witness who 23    is or was at the time of the alleged conduct a student or a 24    person under the age of 18, the hearing officer shall make 25    accommodations to protect a witness from being 26    intimidated, traumatized, or re-traumatized. No alleged   SB3330- 27 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    victim or other witness who is or was at the time of the 2    alleged conduct a student or under the age of 18 may be 3    compelled to testify in the physical or visual presence of 4    a teacher or other witness. If such a witness invokes this 5    right, then the hearing officer must provide an 6    accommodation consistent with the invoked right and use a 7    procedure by which each party may hear such witness's 8    testimony. Accommodations may include, but are not limited 9    to: (i) testimony made via a telecommunication device in a 10    location other than the hearing room and outside the 11    physical or visual presence of the teacher and other 12    hearing participants, but accessible to the teacher via a 13    telecommunication device, (ii) testimony made in the 14    hearing room but outside the physical presence of the 15    teacher and accessible to the teacher via a 16    telecommunication device, (iii) non-public testimony, (iv) 17    testimony made via videoconference with the cameras and 18    microphones of the teacher turned off, or (v) pre-recorded 19    testimony, including, but not limited to, a recording of a 20    forensic interview conducted at an accredited Children's 21    Advocacy Center. With all accommodations, the hearing 22    officer shall give such testimony the same consideration 23    as if the witness testified without the accommodation. The 24    teacher may not directly, or through a representative, 25    question a witness called by the school board who is or was 26    a student or under 18 years of age at the time of the   SB3330- 28 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    alleged conduct. The hearing officer must permit the 2    teacher to submit all relevant questions and follow-up 3    questions for such a witness to have the questions posed 4    by the hearing officer. All questions must exclude 5    evidence of the witness' sexual behavior or 6    predisposition, unless the evidence is offered to prove 7    that someone other than the teacher subject to the 8    dismissal hearing engaged in the charge at issue. 9        (7) The hearing officer shall, within 30 days from the 10    conclusion of the hearing or closure of the record, 11    whichever is later, make a decision as to whether or not 12    the teacher shall be dismissed pursuant to Article 24A of 13    this Code or report to the school board findings of fact 14    and a recommendation as to whether or not the teacher 15    shall be dismissed for cause and shall give a copy of the 16    decision or findings of fact and recommendation to both 17    the teacher and the school board. If a hearing officer 18    fails without good cause, specifically provided in writing 19    to both parties and the State Board of Education, to 20    render a decision or findings of fact and recommendation 21    within 30 days after the hearing is concluded or the 22    record is closed, whichever is later, the parties may 23    mutually agree to select a hearing officer pursuant to the 24    alternative procedure, as provided in this Section, to 25    rehear the charges heard by the hearing officer who failed 26    to render a decision or findings of fact and   SB3330- 29 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    recommendation or to review the record and render a 2    decision. If any hearing officer fails without good cause, 3    specifically provided in writing to both parties and the 4    State Board of Education, to render a decision or findings 5    of fact and recommendation within 30 days after the 6    hearing is concluded or the record is closed, whichever is 7    later, or if any hearing officer fails to make an 8    accommodation as described in paragraph (6.5), the hearing 9    officer shall be removed from the master list of hearing 10    officers maintained by the State Board of Education for 11    not more than 24 months. The parties and the State Board of 12    Education may also take such other actions as it deems 13    appropriate, including recovering, reducing, or 14    withholding any fees paid or to be paid to the hearing 15    officer. If any hearing officer repeats such failure, he 16    or she must be permanently removed from the master list 17    maintained by the State Board of Education and may not be 18    selected by parties through the alternative selection 19    process under this paragraph (7) or paragraph (4) of this 20    subsection (d). The board shall not lose jurisdiction to 21    discharge a teacher if the hearing officer fails to render 22    a decision or findings of fact and recommendation within 23    the time specified in this Section. If the decision of the 24    hearing officer for dismissal pursuant to Article 24A of 25    this Code or of the school board for dismissal for cause is 26    in favor of the teacher, then the hearing officer or   SB3330- 30 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    school board shall order reinstatement to the same or 2    substantially equivalent position and shall determine the 3    amount for which the school board is liable, including, 4    but not limited to, loss of income and benefits.5        (8) The school board, within 45 days after receipt of 6    the hearing officer's findings of fact and recommendation 7    as to whether (i) the conduct at issue occurred, (ii) the 8    conduct that did occur was remediable, and (iii) the 9    proposed dismissal should be sustained, shall issue a 10    written order as to whether the teacher must be retained 11    or dismissed for cause from its employ. The school board's 12    written order shall incorporate the hearing officer's 13    findings of fact, except that the school board may modify 14    or supplement the findings of fact if, in its opinion, the 15    findings of fact are against the manifest weight of the 16    evidence.17        If the school board dismisses the teacher 18    notwithstanding the hearing officer's findings of fact and 19    recommendation, the school board shall make a conclusion 20    in its written order, giving its reasons therefor, and 21    such conclusion and reasons must be included in its 22    written order. The failure of the school board to strictly 23    adhere to the timelines contained in this Section shall 24    not render it without jurisdiction to dismiss the teacher. 25    The school board shall not lose jurisdiction to discharge 26    the teacher for cause if the hearing officer fails to   SB3330- 31 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    render a recommendation within the time specified in this 2    Section. The decision of the school board is final, unless 3    reviewed as provided in paragraph (9) of this subsection 4    (d).5        If the school board retains the teacher, the school 6    board shall enter a written order stating the amount of 7    back pay and lost benefits, less mitigation, to be paid to 8    the teacher, within 45 days after its retention order. 9    Should the teacher object to the amount of the back pay and 10    lost benefits or amount mitigated, the teacher shall give 11    written objections to the amount within 21 days. If the 12    parties fail to reach resolution within 7 days, the 13    dispute shall be referred to the hearing officer, who 14    shall consider the school board's written order and 15    teacher's written objection and determine the amount to 16    which the school board is liable. The costs of the hearing 17    officer's review and determination must be paid by the 18    board.19        (9) The decision of the hearing officer pursuant to 20    Article 24A of this Code or of the school board's decision 21    to dismiss for cause is final unless reviewed as provided 22    in Section 24-16 of this Code. If the school board's 23    decision to dismiss for cause is contrary to the hearing 24    officer's recommendation, the court on review shall give 25    consideration to the school board's decision and its 26    supplemental findings of fact, if applicable, and the   SB3330- 32 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    hearing officer's findings of fact and recommendation in 2    making its decision. In the event such review is 3    instituted, the school board shall be responsible for 4    preparing and filing the record of proceedings, and such 5    costs associated therewith must be divided equally between 6    the parties.7        (10) If a decision of the hearing officer for 8    dismissal pursuant to Article 24A of this Code or of the 9    school board for dismissal for cause is adjudicated upon 10    review or appeal in favor of the teacher, then the trial 11    court shall order reinstatement and shall remand the 12    matter to the school board with direction for entry of an 13    order setting the amount of back pay, lost benefits, and 14    costs, less mitigation. Post reinstatement, the mutually 15    selected hearing officer shall maintain jurisdiction over 16    the back pay so that the The teacher may challenge and the 17    hearing officer may potentially amend the school board's 18    order setting the amount of back pay, lost benefits, 19    interest, and costs, including, but not limited to, 20    attorney's fees, less mitigation, through an expedited 21    arbitration procedure, with the costs of the arbitrator 22    borne by the school board.23        Any teacher who is reinstated by any hearing or 24    adjudication brought under this Section shall be assigned 25    by the board to a position substantially similar to the 26    one which that teacher held prior to that teacher's   SB3330- 33 -LRB104 18726 LNS 32169 b1    suspension or dismissal.2        (11) Subject to any later effective date referenced in 3    this Section for a specific aspect of the dismissal 4    process, the changes made by Public Act 97-8 shall apply 5    to dismissals instituted on or after September 1, 2011. 6    Any dismissal instituted prior to September 1, 2011 must 7    be carried out in accordance with the requirements of this 8    Section prior to amendment by Public Act 97-8. 9    (e) Nothing contained in Public Act 98-648 repeals, 10supersedes, invalidates, or nullifies final decisions in 11lawsuits pending on July 1, 2014 (the effective date of Public 12Act 98-648) in Illinois courts involving the interpretation of 13Public Act 97-8. 14(Source: P.A. 102-708, eff. 4-22-22; 103-354, eff. 1-1-24; 15103-398, eff. 1-1-24; 103-500, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 167-1-24.)